Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

6-19-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that all licensed and certified hospitals provide a service to the public by making health-care services available to the communities they serve.

Furthermore, for purposes of the attorney general's authority over the transfer of nonprofit hospital assets, all nonprofit hospitals shall be deemed to hold all of their assets in trust, and those assets shall be deemed to be dedicated to the specific charitable purposes set forth in the articles of incorporation or other organic documents of the nonprofit entities that hold them in trust. The public is the beneficiary of this trust. Nonprofit hospitals have a substantial and beneficial effect on the provision of health care to the people of Colorado, providing as part of their charitable purposes uncompensated care to the uninsured or underinsured and including, but not limited to, providing moneys and support for health-related research and education or other community benefits. The general assembly also finds that transfers of the assets of nonprofit hospitals to the for-profit sector may directly affect the character and extent of the charitable use of those assets or the proceeds from the assets. The public also has an interest in knowing that the transfer of the assets of a nonprofit hospital, or the proceeds from the assets, preserves, to the extent practicable, their charitable purpose. The general assembly believes it is in the best interest of the public to ensure that the public interest is fully protected whenever the assets of a hospital are transferred to a for-profit entity except in the ordinary course of business.

The general assembly further finds and declares that all transfers of hospital assets or control have the potential to impact the communities they serve. This article is intended to protect the public interest, to assure that nonprofit assets of hospitals are preserved to serve the charitable purposes to which they were dedicated, and to provide the public notice of all transfers of assets of hospitals that constitute covered transitions as defined in this article and shall be construed with these purposes in mind.

The general assembly further finds and declares that the addition of the factors to be considered in relation to the term "material change" in section 6-19-203 (1) is intended to clarify the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article added, p. 520, § 1, effective April 30.

L. 2008:

(4) added, p. 1342, § 1, effective August 5.

6-19-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Covered transaction" means any transaction that would result in the sale, transfer, lease, exchange, or other disposition of fifty percent or more of the assets of a hospital. A series of transactions taking place in any five-year period, which would result in the aggregate of the transfer of fifty percent or more of a hospital's assets, shall in all circumstances be deemed to be a covered transaction. "Covered transaction" shall also include the sale, transfer, or other disposition of the control of a parent company, holding company, or other entity controlling a hospital. For the purposes of this subsection (1), "fifty percent or more of the assets" shall be based on the fair market value of all of the assets of the hospital.

"For-profit entity" means a business corporation, general partnership, limited partnership, limited liability limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership association, and cooperative.

"Hospital" means a licensed or certified hospital as described in section 25-1.5-103 (1)(a)(I) and (1)(a)(II), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article added, p. 521, § 1, effective April 30.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 700, § 4, effective July 1.

6-19-103. Procedures for covered transactions - notice - attorney general powers.

The parties to a covered transaction shall provide notice of such transaction to the attorney general no later than sixty days prior to the transaction closing or effective date of the transaction. The notice to the attorney general shall be in writing, shall include the information required in section 6-19-202, 6-19-302, or 6-19-402, as applicable, and shall contain a certification that public notice of the transaction will be given within seven days after the notification to the attorney general.

Whenever the attorney general has reason to believe that a person has engaged in or is engaging in a covered transaction without complying with the provisions of this article, the attorney general may apply for and obtain, in an action in the appropriate district court of this state, a temporary restraining order or injunction, or both, pursuant to the Colorado rules of civil procedure prohibiting such person from continuing such noncompliance or engaging therein or doing any act in furtherance thereof. The court may make such further orders or judgments, at law or in equity, as may be necessary to remedy such noncompliance.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article added, p. 521, § 1, effective April 30.

6-19-104. Attorney general - effect on powers.

Nothing in this article shall be construed as limiting the attorney general's common law powers.

Nothing in this article shall affect the regulatory authority of any government agency other than the department of law.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article added, p. 522, § 1, effective April 30.